District of Columbia statutes.
2-1207.09

Repealed

Rules and regulations; sponsorship of projects; application by for-profit subsidiary corporation.

Repealed.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-89, § 10, 31 DCR 2514
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 7, 49 DCR 8140
1981 Ed., § 1-2219.
Delegation of authority for District of Columbia Economic Development Finance Corporation Act of 1984, see Mayor’s Order 84-169, September 27, 1984.